Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.015

Regulating soft tree fruits—Commission created—Existing comprehensive scheme—Applicable laws.

The history, economy, culture, and the future of Washington state's agriculture involves the production of soft tree fruits. In order to develop and promote Washington's soft tree fruits as part of an existing comprehensive regulatory scheme the legislature declares:

(1) That the Washington state fruit commission is created;

(2) That it is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that its soft tree fruits be properly promoted by (a) enabling the soft tree fruit industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered cooperative marketing, grading, and standardizing of soft tree fruits they produce; and (b) working to stabilize the soft tree fruit industry by increasing consumption of soft tree fruits within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(3) That producers of soft tree fruits operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the producers of soft tree fruits in their ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(4) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for the soft tree fruit industry be clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that soft tree fruits be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale and use of Washington state's soft tree fruits in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of Washington state's soft tree fruits;

(d) Increase the knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of soft tree fruits;

(e) Support and engage in cooperative programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of soft tree fruits produced in Washington state;

(5) That this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state and to stabilize and protect the soft tree fruit industry of the state; and

(6) That the production and marketing of soft tree fruit is a highly regulated industry and that the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the soft tree fruit industry include:

(a) The federal marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 922 (apricots);

(b) The federal marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 923 (sweet cherries);

(c) The federal marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 924 (prunes);

(d) The federal marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 930 (tart cherries);

(e) The federal marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 931 (Bartlett pears);

(f) Tree fruit research act under chapter 15.26 RCW;

(g) Controlled atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables under chapter 15.30 RCW;

(h) Organic products act under chapter 15.86 RCW;

(i) The food safety and security act under chapter 15.130 RCW;

(j) Washington food processing act under chapter 69.07 RCW;

(k) Washington food storage warehouses act under chapter 69.10 RCW;

(l) Weighmasters under chapter 15.80 RCW;

(m) Horticultural pests and diseases under chapter 15.08 RCW;

(n) Horticultural plants, Christmas trees, and facilities—Inspection and licensing under chapter 15.13 RCW;

(o) Planting stock under chapter 15.14 RCW;

(p) Standards of grades and packs under chapter 15.17 RCW;

(q) Washington pesticide control act under chapter 15.58 RCW;

(r) Farm marketing under chapter 15.64 RCW;

(s) Insect pests and plant diseases under chapter 17.24 RCW;

(t) Weights and measures under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(u) Agricultural products—Commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, and agents under chapter 20.01 RCW; and

(v) Rules under the Washington Administrative Code, Title 16.

[ 2018 c 236 s 701; 2011 c 103 s 28; 2002 c 313 s 103.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.